Washington statutes.
RCW 36.28.160

Office at county seat.

The sheriff must keep an office at the county seat of the county of which he or she is sheriff.

[ 2009 c 105 s 3; 1963 c 4 s 36.28.160. Prior: 1891 c 45 s 2; RRS s 4158. SLC-RO-14.]